New Jersey, session 222, A2432.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall establish such procedures as are necessary to ensure that coverage for respite care services is provided to a Medicaid beneficiary under the following circumstances: a.     the beneficiarys primary payer for health care services, whether public or private, denies coverage, for any reason, for respite care services; and b.    the beneficiary is eligible under Medicaid for coverage of respite care services. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to alter any eligibility requirements for respite care services under Medicaid. As used in this section, Medicaid means the Medicaid program established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.). 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.